Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2321
Administration of act.

In administering the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act, the agents and employees of the department:

(1) Shall have access, upon notification, to any premises where domesticated cervine animals may be for the purpose of implementing the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act; and

(2) May enter any premises occupied by a permitholder at any reasonable time to examine books and records maintained by the permitholder. Such books and records shall be maintained by the permitholder for review for five years after the death or disposal of any domesticated cervine animal from the facility.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 20.